District of Columbia statutes.
48-803.02

Dispensing of generically equivalent drug products.

(a)

(1)

When a pharmacist receives a prescription for a brand name drug, the pharmacist may dispense a generically equivalent drug product that is listed in the Orange Book; provided, that the pharmacist shall dispense a generically equivalent drug product if requested by the purchaser, except as provided in § 48-803.03.

(2)

If a generic substitution is made pursuant to this subsection, the pharmacist shall dispense the generically equivalent drug product in stock having the lowest cost to the person purchasing the drug product.

(b)

When a pharmacist receives a prescription for a drug by generic name, the pharmacist shall dispense the listed product in stock that has the lowest cost to the person purchasing the drug product.

(c)

Repealed.

History

Sept. 10, 1976, D.C. Law 1-81, title III, § 302, 23 DCR 2460
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-114, § 4(a), 23 DCR 8743
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-118, § 2(b), 57 DCR 901

Section References

This section is referenced in § 48-803.03 and § 48-803.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-732.
1973 Ed., § 33-832.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-118 rewrote the section.